Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,100
Evidence of coverage, defined.

Evidence of coverage shall mean a statement of the essential features and services of the health maintenance organization coverage which is given to the subscriber by the health maintenance organization or by the group contract holder.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 9.